Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 15 Administrative Procedures
25-15-101. Interpreters generally.

As used in this section, “interpreter” means an interpreter as defined in § 25-15-102.

A person who cannot speak or understand the English language or who because of hearing, speaking, or other impairment has difficulty in communicating with other persons and who is a party to a civil proceeding or a witness in a civil proceeding is entitled to an interpreter to assist that person throughout the proceeding.

An interpreter may be retained by the party or witness himself or herself or, if the person is unable to pay for an interpreter, may be appointed by the administrative board or agency before which the proceeding is pending.

If an interpreter is appointed by the board or agency, the fee for the services of the interpreter shall be set by the board or agency and be paid from funds available to the board or agency or be paid in any other manner ordered by the board or agency.

An administrative agency may inquire into the qualifications and integrity of an interpreter and may disqualify any person for cause from serving as an interpreter.

An interpreter for another person who is either a party or a witness in an administrative proceeding under this section shall take the following oath:

“Do you solemnly swear (or affirm) that you will justly, truly, and impartially interpret tothe oath about to be administered to him (her), and the questions which may be asked him (her), and the answers that he (she) shall give to such questions, relative to the cause now under consideration before this board (agency), so help you God (or under the pains and penalties of perjury)?”

Amendments. The 2013 amendment inserted (a) and redesignated former (a) through (d) as (b) through (e); in present (b), substituted “to a civil proceeding” for “in any administrative proceeding” and “in a civil proceeding is” for “therein, shall be”; and made stylistic changes to the section.

“Administrative proceeding” means a proceeding of a department, board, commission, agency, committee, or licensing authority of the state or of a political subdivision or municipality;

“Deaf individual” means an individual who has a documented hearing loss so severe that the individual is unable to process speech and language through hearing, with or without amplification;

“Deafblind individual” means an individual who has a combined loss of vision and hearing that prevents the individual's vision or hearing from being used as a primary source for accessing information;

“Hard of hearing individual” means an individual who has a hearing loss, may primarily use visual communication, and may use assistive devices;

“Interpreter” means a licensed qualified interpreter or a licensed provisional interpreter licensed by the Department of Health under § 20-14-801 et seq.;

“Oral deaf individual” means an individual whose sense of hearing is nonfunctional for the purpose of communication and whose primary communication is by speech reading and spoken English; and

“Oral interpreter” means a licensed qualified interpreter or a licensed provisional interpreter who interprets language through facial and lip movements only and who does not use manual communication.

The waiver is subject to approval of counsel to the individual who is oral deaf, if existent, and is subject to approval of the appointing authority.

A department, board, commission, agency, committee, or licensing authority of the state or of a political subdivision or municipality shall appoint an interpreter to interpret an administrative proceeding to an individual who is deaf, deafblind, hard of hearing, or oral deaf and to interpret the testimony or statements of the individual who is deaf, deafblind, hard of hearing, or oral deaf.

(1)An individual who is deaf, deafblind, hard of hearing, or oral deaf whose appearance before a proceeding entitles him or her to an interpreter shall notify the appointing authority of the need of the individual who is deaf, deafblind, hard of hearing, or oral deaf before an appearance and shall request at that time the services of an interpreter.

This notification shall be sufficient for the duration of the participation of the individual who is deaf, deafblind, hard of hearing, or oral deaf in the proceedings.

An appointing authority may require a person requesting the appointment of an interpreter to furnish reasonable proof of the deafness of the individual who is deaf, deafblind, hard of hearing, or oral deaf when the appointing authority has reason to believe that the deaf person, deafblind person, hard of hearing person, or oral deaf person is not deaf, deafblind, hard of hearing, or oral deaf.

The appointing authority shall channel requests for qualified interpreters through the Department of Health.

Before an interpreter participates in any proceedings subsequent to an appointment under this section, the interpreter shall make an oath or affirmation that the interpreter will:

Make a true interpretation in an understandable manner to the individual who is deaf, deafblind, hard of hearing, or oral deaf for whom the interpreter is appointed; and

Interpret the statements of the individual who is deaf, deafblind, hard of hearing, or oral deaf desiring that statements be made in the language best suited to the needs of the individual who is deaf, deafblind, hard of hearing, or oral deaf.

The appointing authority shall provide recess periods as necessary for the interpreter when the interpreter requests a recess period.

Information that the interpreter gathers, learns from, or relays to the individual who is deaf, deafblind, hard of hearing, or oral deaf pertaining to an administrative, civil, or criminal proceeding shall at all times remain confidential and privileged, on an equal basis with the attorney-client privilege, unless the individual who is deaf, deafblind, hard of hearing, or oral deaf desires that the information be communicated to other persons.

An interpreter appointed under this section is entitled to a reasonable fee for his or her services.

The fee shall be in accordance with standards established by the Department of Health and in addition to actual expenses for travel and transportation.

If the interpreter is appointed by a court, the fee shall be paid out of general county funds.

If the interpreter is otherwise appointed, the fee shall be paid out of funds available to the appointing authority.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1979, No. 664, §§ 1, 2, are also codified as §§16-64-112,16-89-105.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “between a hearing individual and an individual who is deaf, deafblind, hard of hearing, or oral deaf” for “for the deaf” in the section heading, and rewrote the section.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Survey—Evidence, 14 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 793.

(1)Any and all administrative hearings before an agency of this state in which any attorney for either party to any suit is the Lieutenant Governor, or a member of the Senate or the House of Representatives, or is a clerk or sergeant at arms or a doorkeeper of either branch of the General Assembly, and any and all administrative hearings before an agency of this state in which the Lieutenant Governor, or any member of the General Assembly, or clerk or sergeant at arms or doorkeeper of either branch of the General Assembly is a party, shall be stayed for not fewer than fifteen (15) days preceding the convening of the General Assembly and for thirty (30) days after its adjournment sine die, unless otherwise requested by any interested member of the General Assembly or interested officer or employee of the General Assembly.

Any and all administrative hearings before an agency of this state in which any attorney for either party to any suit is a member of the Legislative Council, the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, or any interim committee of the General Assembly shall be stayed, or reset if scheduled, if the proceeding or hearing has been scheduled on the day immediately prior to, the day immediately after, or the day upon which the Legislative Council, Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, or any interim committee is meeting and if the attorney is a member of the committee which is meeting, or an alternate member attending in the place of a regular member, and the attorney requests the continuance of the court no fewer than three (3) days before the proceeding is to commence.

The term “adjournment sine die” as used in this section means adjournment without the establishment of a day certain for reconvening.

The provisions of this section shall be applicable in the case of special or extraordinary sessions of the General Assembly as well as regular sessions.

(1)The following boards and commissions shall have the power to issue subpoenas and bring before the board or commission as a witness any person in this state:

Auctioneer's Licensing Board, § 17-17-201 et seq.;

State Athletic Commission, § 17-22-201 et seq.;

Cosmetology Technical Advisory Committee, § 17-26-201 et seq.;

Arkansas Board of Examiners in Counseling, § 17-27-201 et seq.;

State Board of Embalmers, Funeral Directors, Cemeteries, and Burial Services, § 23-61-1101 et seq.;

Committee of Plumbing Examiners, § 17-38-202;

Arkansas Social Work Licensing Board, § 17-103-201 et seq.;

HVACR Licensing Board, § 17-33-201 et seq.;

Liquefied Petroleum Gas Board, § 15-75-201 et seq.;

Judicial Discipline and Disability Commission, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 66, and § 16-10-401 et seq.;

Veterinary Medical Examining Board, § 17-101-201 et seq.;

Arkansas Board of Dispensing Opticians, § 17-89-201 et seq.;

State Board of Election Commissioners, § 7-4-101 et seq.;

State Board of Health, § 20-7-101 et seq.; and

Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training, § 12-9-101 et seq.

The subpoena shall:

These boards and commissions shall provide by rule for the issuance of a subpoena upon the request of any party to a proceeding pending before the board or commission or at the request of the board or commission.

Be in the name of the board or commission;

State the name of the board or commission and the name of the proceeding; and

Command each person to whom it is directed to give testimony at the time and place specified in the subpoena in one (1) of the following ways:

In person;

Before a certified court reporter under oath at the place of the witness's residence or employment;

By video-taped deposition at the place of the witness's residence or employment; or

By live video communications from the witness' residence, place of employment, or a nearby facility capable of providing video transmission to the state agency that has subpoenaed the witness.

The manner of providing testimony under the subpoena shall be conducted by in person testimony unless another manner is agreed upon by the board or commission and the person who is the subject of the subpoena.

The subpoena may require the witness to bring with him or her any book, writing, or other thing under his or her control that he or she is bound by law to produce in evidence.

Service of the subpoena shall be in the manner as now provided by statute or rule for the service of subpoenas in civil cases.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment by No. 83 added (a)(1)(O) and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 1182, in (a)(2), inserted “and commissions” and “or commission” twice;, rewrote (a)(3); substituted “subpoena” for “writ” in (a)(4), and (a)(5); rewrote (b)(1); in (b)(2), inserted “or commission” twice and substituted “provide testimony” for “attend the hearing,”; inserted (b)(4); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment substituted “Cosmetology Technical Advisory Committee” for “State Board of Cosmetology” in (a)(1)(C); deleted (a)(1)(F) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and substituted “has been served” for “shall have been served” in (b)(2).

The 2017 amendment by No. 497 added (a)(1)(O).

The 2017 amendment by No. 788 substituted “State Board of Embalmers, Funeral Directors, Cemeteries, and Burial Services, §23-61-1101 et seq.” for “State Board of Embalmers and Funeral Directors, §17-29-201 et seq.” in (a)(1)(E).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, No. 788, § 2: July 1, 2018.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Professions, Occupations, and Businesses, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 535.

Assess a certain type and amount of fee or penalty; or

Impose a fee or penalty in general.

A fee or penalty established in the rules of an agency before the effective date of this section that does not comply with subdivision (b)(1) of this section may remain in effect until July 1, 2013, but shall not be increased above the amount established by the agency for that fee or penalty as of the effective date of this section.

Subsection (b) of this section does not affect an agency's authority to deny, suspend, and revoke licenses within its regulatory authority.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 315, § 1, provided:

“Legislative findings and intent.

“(a)The General Assembly finds:

“(1)The Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-202(9)(A) defines ‘rule’ as ‘an agency statement of general applicability and future effect that implements, interprets, or prescribes law or policy, or describes the organization, procedure, or practice of an agency and includes, but is not limited to, the amendment or repeal of a prior rule’.

“(2)While the term ‘regulation’ is not defined in the Administrative Procedure Act, the term is used interchangeably with the defined term ‘rule’ throughout the Arkansas Code;

“(3)Use of the term ‘regulation’ out of the proper context creates confusion and inconsistency in the Arkansas Code;

“(4)This act provides for the uniform use of the term ‘rule’ for an agency statement of general applicability and future effect that implements, interprets, or prescribes law or policy, or describes the organization, procedure, or practice of an agency and includes, but is not limited to, the amendment or repeal of a prior rule throughout the Arkansas Code as envisioned by defining of the term in the Administrative Procedures Act.

“(b)It is the intent of the General Assembly that the uniform use of the term rule shall be applied to mean an agency statement of general applicability and future effect that implements, interprets, or prescribes law or policy, or describes the organization, procedure, or practice of an agency and includes, but is not limited to, the amendment or repeal of a prior rule, and includes a regulation”.

Acts 2019, No. 517, § 3, provided:

“The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)It is common for acts of the General Assembly to delegate rulemaking authority to a state agency for the purpose of implementing and administering various duties and responsibilities;

“(2)Broad interpretation of rulemaking authority by a state agency results in the state agency's supplanting the role of the General Assembly by effectively legislating in areas not intended by the General Assembly; and

“(3)A state agency that has been delegated rulemaking authority should limit its rulemaking to only those areas absolutely necessary and should avoid broad applications or interpretations of its rulemaking power”.

Acts 2019, No. 893, § 1, provided: “Legislative Findings and Intent.

“(a)Acts 2019, No. 315, requires the consistent reference and use of the term ‘rule' and the elimination of unnecessary references to the term ‘regulation'.

“(b)Acts 2019, No. 315 states that no governmental entity shall be required to re-promulgate existing regulations as rules solely to comply with this act.

“(c)Certain agencies are required to follow the procedure under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq., for the promulgation of a new or amended rule.

“(d)To facilitate and ensure the use of the term ‘rule' by an agency when no update or change to the existing rule is expected or anticipated, the General Assembly finds that certain procedures under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq., may be waived.

“(e)A governmental entity is not required to follow the procedure set forth in §25-15-204 if:

“(1)The only change being made to the promulgated rule or regulation by the agency is the replacement of the term ‘regulation' with the term ‘rule';

“(2)The agency files the updated rule with the Secretary of State on or before January 1, 2020; and

“(3)A letter is provided to the Legislative Council by the agency stating that a rule has been filed with the Secretary of State's office, the name of the rule, a brief description of the rule, and an affirmative statement that the only change to the rule is a change from the use of the term ‘regulation' to the term ‘rule'.

“(f)An agency may continue to follow the procedure set forth in §25-15-204 for the adoption of a rule that changes the term ‘regulation' to ‘rule’” .

Publisher's Notes. For Comments regarding the Uniform Law Commissioner's Revised Model State Administrative Procedure Act, see Commentaries Volume B.

Preambles. Acts 1971, No. 316 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, in order to clarify administrative procedures concerning the Employment Security Laws of Arkansas, and in order to correct omission of the Employment Security Division in the original Administrative Procedure Act of 1967; and

“Whereas, it will benefit the courts to clarify the administrative procedure now being followed by the courts on appeals relative to the Redevelopment Security Laws; and

“Whereas, the administrative procedures set forth in § 81-1101, et seq., Arkansas Statutes (official) have been consistently followed for a long period of time and are now followed by the respective courts of appeal from the administrative procedures now outlined in the Employment Security Laws.”

Effective Dates. Acts 1971, No. 316, § 2: Mar. 17, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the orderly and consistent administrative procedures of the Employment Security Laws should not be in doubt as many of the unemployed and the employers in this state are affected by such procedure; and such law with many cases now pending before the administrative sections provided for in the Employment Security Laws, and such procedures having provided adequate administrative procedures and remedies for many years; and in order to definitely clarify same; an emergency is hereby declared to exist and it being necessary for the public peace, health, and safety of the state this act shall be in full force and effect after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 349, § 4: Mar. 3, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the existing laws pertaining to license, revocation and suspension by the Child Care Facility Review Board permit the Board to revoke licenses without notice and without a hearing, which procedures are likely violative of the due process laws of the Constitution of the State Arkansas and of the United States; that this Act is designed to correct this undesirable situation by requiring the Child Care Facility Review Board to comply with the provisions of the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Law, and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 720, § 6: July 1, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-First General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1977 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1977 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and providing of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1977.”

Acts 1979, No. 324, § 18: July 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Second General Assembly, that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1979 is essential to the operation of the agency established in this Act and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1979 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and providing of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1979.”

Acts 1979, No. 704, § 2: Apr. 2, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found, determined and declared by the General Assembly that the orderly administration of justice presupposes a notice and hearing before the rights of individuals and of the people of the State of Arkansas are affected by judicial action and that, upon occasion, orders limiting the powers of administrative boards to protect the public from the wrongful and hurtful acts of practitioners have been issued by reviewing tribunals without notice and hearing, and that this Act is designed to correct this problem and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 709, § 4: March 20, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that inmates of the Department of Correction have numerous avenues of administrative due process; that it is not necessary to provide them with judicial review under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act; and that state funds could be saved by reducing the amount of money expended by the Department of Correction on legal fees to defend against these unnecessary administrative appeals by inmates. Therefore, in order to avoid the unnecessary expenditure of legal fees for defending the Department of Correction in the administrative appeal procedures, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.

Acts 1989, No. 932, § 5: March 24, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that recent court interpretations have resulted in uncertainty for state agencies as to when administrative rules and regulations may become effective; that to extend the date of their effectiveness beyond twenty (20) days would work an undue hardship on implementation of such rules and regulations. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 1075, § 25: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by Seventy-Eighth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1991 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1991 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1993, No. 1083, § 5: Apr. 13, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is necessary for permit and license holders from the various state agencies to receive information from the agencies from which they hold permits when disciplinary proceedings are pending and that, therefore, immediate effect should be given to this measure and an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 533, § 8: Mar. 17, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there are presently inadequate statutory guidelines for the codifications of the acts of the General Assembly; that this act establishes necessary guidelines; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order that the guidelines will be in effect for the codification of the acts of this regular session. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 937, § 5: Mar. 31, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under current law any person may file a complaint with a state occupational or professional licensing board concerning a licensee of the board; that inmates of the Department of Correction are currently permitted to file such complaints without having exhausted their remedies under the Department of Correction grievance process; that the inmates have filed numerous complaints that have not been substantiated and have resulted in an unnecessary waste of time by certain state licensing boards and substantial cost to the taxpayers of the state; and that the law should be amended immediately to require inmates of the Department of Correction to exhaust their remedies under the Department grievance process before filing complaints with state licensing boards. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1222, § 21: Apr. 8, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that it is essential to the effective and efficient administration of the Child Care Licensing program that the responsibility for reviewing appeals be placed in the Child Care Appeal Review Panel under the Department of Human Services, as soon as possible and that this act is designed to accomplish this purpose and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval of the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 38, § 4: Apr. 11, 2006. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that current Arkansas law does not provide sufficient information on the cost of administrative rules promulgated by the State Board of Education and the State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities; and that this bill will provide critical information on the cost of administrative rules to public school districts and will minimize the possibility of the placement of unfunded mandates upon public school districts. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 143, § 3: February 23, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that small businesses represent a vital part of the economy of the State of Arkansas; that this act will protect small businesses from inadvertent financial harm caused by administrative rules; and that this act should become effective as soon as possible to shield small businesses from potential harm. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Ark. L. Rev.

Administrative Law — Taxpayer Status to Challenge Administrative Actions Under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, 25 Ark. L. Rev. 160.

Judicial Review of Administrative Agencies in Arkansas, 25 Ark. L. Rev. 397.

Watkins, Access to Public Records Under the Arkansas Freedom of Information Act, 37 Ark. L. Rev. 741.

Watkins, Open Meetings Under the Arkansas Freedom of Information Act, 38 Ark. L. Rev. 268.

Antley, Judicial Review of Non-Court Decisions: A Constitutionally Based Examination of Arkansas' Review System, 49 Ark. L. Rev. 425.

C.J.S. 73 C.J.S., Pub. Admin. L., § 87 et seq.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Survey of Arkansas Law: Administrative Law, 6 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 59.

Stafford, Separation of Powers and Arkansas Administrative Agencies: Distinguishing Judicial Power and Legislative Power, 7 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 279.

Survey — Miscellaneous, Federal Income Tax — Definition of “Trade or Business”, 10 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 223.

Survey, Miscellaneous — Administrative Law, 13 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 379.

Antley, The “Appearance of Fairness” Versus “Actual Unfairness”: Which Standard Should the Arkansas Courts Apply to Administrative Agencies?, 16 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 587.

This subchapter has two purposes: to require certain designated state agencies to adopt and make public procedural rules, including methods whereby the public can make submissions or requests; and to afford adjudication rights in matters over which the agencies have jurisdiction. Ark. State Hwy. Comm'n v. Wood, 264 Ark. 425, 572 S.W.2d 583 (1978).

This subchapter was never designed nor intended to create supervisory responsibility by the judicial branch of state government over the day-to-day actions of the executive branch, including the hiring and firing of personnel, but rather, to establish procedures for hearings and notice (which meet due process requirements) in those functions of the executive branch which are basically adjudicatory or quasi-judicial, particularly with respect to rule making, the renewal or revocation of licenses, and situations where, under law, an agency of the state must make orders based on the adjudication process. Arkansas Livestock & Poultry Comm'n v. House, 276 Ark. 326, 634 S.W.2d 388 (1982).

Since local school districts are political subdivisions of the state and not state agencies within the meaning of the act, this subchapter does not apply to local school districts. Corbin v. Special Sch. Dist., 250 Ark. 357, 465 S.W.2d 342 (1971).

The Alcoholic Beverage Commission is not an agency excepted from this subchapter and is therefore subject to its provisions. Byrd v. Jones, 263 Ark. 406, 565 S.W.2d 131 (1978).

Former section authorizing State Highway Commission to adopt rules did not affect the adjudicatory provisions of this subchapter and the State Highway Commission was subject to the act. Ark. State Hwy. Comm'n v. Wood, 264 Ark. 425, 572 S.W.2d 583 (1978).

The State Insurance Commissioner, when acting as a hearing officer, is governed by this subchapter. Garner v. Foundation Life Ins. Co., 17 Ark. App. 13, 702 S.W.2d 417 (1986).

The Supreme Court is not subject to the Administrative Procedure Act. Muhammed v. Arkansas Supreme Court Comm. on Professional Conduct, 291 Ark. 29, 722 S.W.2d 280 (1987).

Appeal from a decision by Arkansas State Board of Education is governed by this subchapter. Arkansas State Bd. of Educ. v. Purifoy, 292 Ark. 526, 731 S.W.2d 209, 1987 Ark. LEXIS 2179 (1987), superseded by statute as stated in, Walker v. Ark. State Bd. of Educ., 2010 Ark. 277, 365 S.W.3d 899 (2010).

The Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, providing for a review from actions of state commissions and agencies, has no application to the State Claims Commission. Fireman's Ins. Co. v. Ark. State Claims Comm'n, 301 Ark. 451, 784 S.W.2d 771, cert. denied,498 U.S. 824, 111 S. Ct. 76, 112 L. Ed. 2d 50 (1990).

Where the Health Services Commission concluded it would only apply three of nine priorities used to determine need, and it gave a well-reasoned explanation and applied the priorities consistently, because the procedures adopted by an agency may vary according to the purpose for which a review is conducted, the commission's actions did not amount to a change of its rules requiring compliance with the Administrative Procedures Act. Beverly Enterprises-Arkansas, Inc. v. Ark. Health Servs. Comm'n, 308 Ark. 221, 824 S.W.2d 363 (1992).

The judicial review provisions of this subchapter are not applicable to the discharge of an employee; the discharge of an employee is not an adjudication but administrative decision and the circuit court is without jurisdiction to review such actions. Viswanathan v. Mississippi County Cmty Coll. Bd. of Trs., 318 Ark. 810, 887 S.W.2d 531 (1994), cert. denied, 516 U.S. 815 (1995).

Recommendations by a state board as to the adoption of a mail order service and change in the reimbursement rates of a pharmacy service plan for state and public school employees did not constitute “rule-making” within §25-15-202(8), (9) of the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq., and accordingly, the notice and hearing provisions therein did not have to be complied with; such recommendations were within the board's legislatively mandated duties, pursuant to §21-5-401. Arkansas Pharmacist's Ass'n v. Arkansas State & Pub. Sch. Life and Hlth. Ins. Bd., 352 Ark. 1, 98 S.W.3d 27 (2003).

The rules governing judicial review of administrative decisions are identical for both the circuit and appellate courts, and it is the decision of the agency, rather than that of the circuit court, which the appellate court reviews. City of Hector v. Arkansas Soil & Water Conservation Comm'n, 47 Ark. App. 177, 888 S.W.2d 312 (1994).

In cases arising under this subchapter, the appellate court reverses only if substantial evidence is lacking, an abuse of discretion has occurred, or if the agency has acted in an arbitrary or capricious manner. City of Hector v. Arkansas Soil & Water Conservation Comm'n, 47 Ark. App. 177, 888 S.W.2d 312 (1994).

Cited: Harber v. Rhodes, 248 Ark. 1188, 455 S.W.2d 926 (1970); Arkansas State Racing Comm'n v. Sayler, 249 Ark. 913, 462 S.W.2d 472 (1971); Hickman v. Arkansas Bd. of Pardons & Paroles, 361 F. Supp. 864 (E.D. Ark. 1973); Travelers Indem. Co. v. Monroe, 257 Ark. 1029, 522 S.W.2d 431 (1975); Boshears v. Ark. Racing Comm'n, 258 Ark. 741, 528 S.W.2d 646 (1975); Sikes v. General Publishing Co., 264 Ark. 1, 568 S.W.2d 33 (1978); Bushong v. State, 267 Ark. 113, 589 S.W.2d 559 (1979); Woodyard v. Arkansas Diversified Ins. Co., 268 Ark. 94, 594 S.W.2d 13 (1980); Hilton Hilltop, Inc. v. Riviere, 268 Ark. 532, 597 S.W.2d 596 (1980); Price v. State, 268 Ark. 535, 597 S.W.2d 598, 1980 Ark. LEXIS 1457 (1980); Evans v. Arkansas Racing Comm'n, 270 Ark. 788, 606 S.W.2d 578 (1980); Ark. State Hwy. Comm'n v. White Adv. Int'l, 273 Ark. 364, 620 S.W.2d 280 (1981); Goodall v. Williams, 271 Ark. 354, 609 S.W.2d 25 (1980); Brazil v. Ark. Bd. of Dental Exam'rs, 593 F. Supp. 1354 (E.D. Ark. 1984); Arkansas State Bd. of Pharmacy v. Isely, 13 Ark. App. 111, 680 S.W.2d 718 (1984); ABC Div. v. Barnett, 285 Ark. 189, 685 S.W.2d 511 (1985); Patterson v. Robbins, 295 Ark. 511, 749 S.W.2d 330 (1988); McCarty v. Board of Trustees, 45 Ark. App. 102, 872 S.W.2d 74 (1994); Holloway v. State Bd. of Architects, 79 Ark. App. 200, 86 S.W.3d 391 (2002);

Arkansas Dep't of Human Servs. v. Haen, 81 Ark. App. 171, 100 S.W.3d 740, 2003 Ark. App. LEXIS 206 (2003).

History.

Acts 1973, No. 555, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-715; Acts 2013, No. 1314, § 4.